tables/hu-hu-g1.ctb
# liblouis: Hungarian Grade 1 table
#
#  Copyright (C) 2011-2022 Attila Hammer from IT Foundation for the Visually Impaired - Hungary. www.infoalap.hu
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Maintained by Attila Hammer  hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#
# If you found bugs with hungarian grade1 table, report it with following address:
# Attila Hammer <hammer.attila@infoalap.hu
#If you have a Launchpad account, report table related requests with following bug tracker address: https://bugs.launchpad.net/belin

#-index-name: Hungarian, uncontracted
#-display-name: Hungarian partially contracted braille

#+language: hu
#+type: literary
#+contraction: no
#+grade: 1
# Marked as "direction:both" by Bue Vester-Andersen
# as tests run both forward and backward
#+direction: both

# Braille-specs documentation link: https://liblouis.io/braille-specs/hungarian

include hu-backtranslate-correction.dis
include hu-chardefs.cti
include hu-exceptionwords.cti
include hu-backtranslate-word-corrections.cti
include braille-patterns.cti
#Braille indicators
numsign 3456
capsletter 46
begcapsword 46-46
#Now, not have rule to mark a dot combination the end of capital words part the mixed partialy capital and lowercase letters containing words, following three line rules are commented out
#endcapsword 56
#noback pass2 $U2-30[@56] @6
#noback pass2 $U2-30[@5]$l2-30 @6
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
begemph italic 356
endemph italic  236
begemph bold 356
endemph bold 236
begemph underline 356
endemph underline 236
begcomp 456-346
endcomp 456-156
# literary forms of the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti
attribute notaccentedletters abcdefghijABCDEFGHIJ-
attribute accentedletters áéíöőüűúóklmnopqrstuvwxyz
include hu-hu-g1_braille_input.cti
midendnumericmodechars ,:.-
nonumsign 6
numericnocontchars abcdefghij
#Correcting forward translation when after a number following a hyphen
#character, and a literary digit letter (for example a, b, c, etc).
#This situation not need putting the dot 6 combination
noback pass2 $D[@36-6]%notaccentedletters @36
noback pass2 $D[@36-36-6]%notaccentedletters @36-36
#Correcting backward translation too, because for example the „#bj-ai”,
#„#be-ei” eurobraille output since Liblouis 3.9.0 version producing numbers
#the back translation, not the „20-ai”, „25-ei” strings.
#wrong backtranslated output is „20-19”, „25-59”
nofor pass2 $D[@36-36]%notaccentedletters @36-36-6
nofor pass2 $D[@36]%notaccentedletters @36-6
#Now, commented out the multind indicator rule with Braille input related
#multind 56 nocontractsign endcapsword
#Special letter replacements
always cs 146	General need replacing cs letters with a combined dot combination
always ccs 146-146	General need replacing ccs letters with a combined dot combination
always csz 14-156
always cszs 146-345
always ccsz 14-14-156
always gy 1456	General need replacing gy letters with a combined dot combination
always ggy 1456-1456	General need replacing ggy letters with a combined dot combination
always ly 456
always lly 456-456	General need replacing ly letters with a combined dot combination
always ny 1246	General need replacing ny letters with a combined dot combination
always nny 1246-1246	General need replacing nny letters with a combined dot combination
always ty 1256	General need replacing ty letter pairs with a combined dot combination
always tty 1256-1256		General need replacing ty letter pairs with a combined dot combination
always sz 156	General need replacing sz letters with a combined dot combination
always ssz 156-156
always zsz 126-156
always zs 345	General need replacing zs letters with a combined dot combination
always zzs 345-345	General need replacing zs letters with a combined dot combination
always " 236	Need this rule to present one left quotation mark if the user firsttyping the " character
word "" 236-356
always ( 2346	Need this rule to the user always see 2346 dot combination if type first ( character a text
always ) 1356	Need this rule to the user always see 1356 dot combination if type first ) character a text
always # 123456
always $ 5-145
always % 3456-245-356
always ~ 5-2345
always < 5-13
always > 46-2
always / 5-2
always | 5-1245
always { 5-2346
always } 5-1356
always [ 46-2346
always ] 46-1356
always \\ 5-16
always ^ 5-124
always ` 5-14
noback always Æ 1
always lyú 456-346
always lysz 456-156
always ä 5-1
uppercase Ä 5-1
noback always \\_ 6 letter sign before Roman page numbers
undefined 26
